Missouri, session 2026, HB2557.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 197, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
2 known as section 197.062, to read as follows:
197.062. A hospital with an emergency department shall have at least one
2 physician on site and on duty who is responsible for the emergency department at all
3 times the emergency department is open.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.